Utah statutes.
76-6-603.   Detention of suspected violator by merchant -- Purposes.
(1)  Any merchant who has probable cause to believe that a person has
committed retail theft may detain such person, on or off the premises of a
retail mercantile establishment, in a reasonable manner and for a reasonable
length of time for all or any of the following purposes:
(a)  to make reasonable inquiry as to whether such person has in his
possession unpurchased merchandise and to make reasonable investigation of the
ownership of such merchandise;
(b)  to request identification;
(c)  to verify such identification;
(d)  to make a reasonable request of such person to place or keep in full view
any merchandise such individual may have removed, or which the merchant has
reason to believe he may have removed, from its place of display or elsewhere,
whether for examination, purchase, or for any other reasonable purpose;
(e)  to inform a peace officer of the detention of the person and surrender
that person to the custody of a peace officer;
(f)  in the case of a minor, to inform a peace officer, the parents, guardian,
or other private person interested in the welfare of that minor immediately,
if possible, of this detention and to surrender custody of such minor to such
person.
(2)  A merchant may make a detention as permitted herein off the premises of a
retail mercantile establishment only if such detention is pursuant to an
immediate pursuit of such person.
